Florida, session 2026, HB7011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 597.0042, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
597.0042 Public records exemptions; aquaculture records.—
(4) This section is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7011 -00-er